src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.GI@ @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.TAMA.si@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.GI.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.GI@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.OUTERSUBJECT.ON@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.TAMA.si@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@ @U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@ @U.OUTERSUBJECT.ON@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.CONATIVE.ON@ @D.CONATIVE@ @R.CONATIVE.ON@ @D.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @P.PREFIX.OUTER@ @P.CONATIVE.OFF@ @R.CONATIVE.OFF@ @U.VV.I@ @U.VV.%0@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.AREAL@ @U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@ @P.PREFIX.INNER@ @U.CONATIVE.ON@ @U.CONATIVE.OFF@ @D.PREFIX.OUTER@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @D.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @D.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@ @D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @U.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@ ^H


LEXICON Root

@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                              IntransitiveMarkers;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                             IntransitiveMarkers;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                                TransitiveMarkers;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                              TransitiveMarkers;
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@                                Only3SGSubject;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@                            DirectSubjectAffixes;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@                            #;


LEXICON IntransitiveMarkers

! With intransitive and oblique object verbs, the only two sets of affixes
! that can appear in this region of the verb: (1) the conative prefix, and
! (2) the two 'outer' subject markers gi- 3PL (if it hasn't occurred earlier
! in the verb, which can happen with some oblique object forms) and ts'i- 4SG.
! Since the conative comes first among these, we proceed there first.

@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                       Conative;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       Conative;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.GI@                 Filter-SBJ-IO;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@gi
!    Filter-SBJ-IO;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ts'i
!    Filter-SBJ-IO;


LEXICON TransitiveMarkers

! With transitive verbs, three different kinds of prefixes can appear in this
! part of the verb, in the following order:
!
!   1. Direct object markers (which may take different forms, depending on
!      the person and number of the subject; or, for third-person objects,
!      may be omitted when a coreferential full nominal is present and/or
!      when the subject is not third-person)
!
!   2. The 'conative' (K. Rice 2000) or 'half-transitive' (Leer 1996, 2005)
!      prefix /í-/, which appears between the direct object markers and any
!      following outer subject prefix.
!
!   3. Outer subject markers, namely 3PL.SBJ gi- "they" and 4SG.SBJ ts'i-
!      "someone (unseen, unspecified, or holy)".

! 1SG direct object (e.g., siyíʔí "you (sg.) saw me")
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@si        DO-Present;

! 2SG direct object (e.g., niyisʔí "I saw you")
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ni        DO-Present;

! Handle 3SG direct objects in their own lexicon.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                           3SG-DO;

! 1PL direct object (e.g., nihiyíʔí / nahiyíʔí "you (sg.) saw us").  After an
! outer prefix, this has the form naa- (e.g., dànaádíyískid "you (sg.) asked
! each and every one of us").
!
! TODO: Confirm that naa- is the appropriate form after dà- (e.g., dànaayíʔí
! and not *dànahiyíʔí / *dànihiyíʔí), and tag nihi- and nahi- for their
! respective dialects.
@D.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@nihi
   DO-Present;
@D.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@nahi
   DO-Present;
@R.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@naa
   DO-Present;

! 2PL direct object (e.g., nihiyisʔí / nahiyisʔí "I saw you (pl.)").  After an
! outer prefix, this has the form naa- (e.g., nánaàyistsòni "I might see you
! again later on"; cf. TLL-20230310).
!
! TODO: Confirm that naa- is the appropriate form after dà- (e.g., dànaayisʔí
! and not *dànahiyisʔí / *dànihiyisʔí), and tag nihi- and nahi- for their
! respective dialects.
@D.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@nihi 
   DO-Present;
@D.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@nahi
   DO-Present;
@R.PREFIX.OUTER@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@naa 
   DO-Present;

! Handle 3PL direct objects in their own lexicon.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                           3PL-DO;

! 4SG (unspecified) direct object (e.g., guyisʔí "I saw someone").
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@gu        DO-Present;

! Areal direct object (e.g., guyisʔí "I saw it (a place or space)").
! This prefix is homophonous with 4SG.DO gu- (and with 3>3PL.DO gu-), but
! syntactically and semantically distinct; cf. TLQ-20210521.
!
! TODO: We treat areal objects as if they were singular, but, like 4SG 
! subjects and direct objects, they could likely be seen as being unmarked
! for number.  
@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@gu    DO-Present;

! Handle reflexives in their own lexicon.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                          Reflexive-DO;

! Handle reciprocals in their own lexicon.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                         Reciprocal-DO;

! The indefinite object marker i- "something" in Tsuut'ina rides the fence
! between inflectional and derivational affixation.  On the one hand, i-
! doesn't co-occur with the other direct object markers seen above, and has a
! regular, direct-object-related meaning whenever present (e.g., iyisʔí(n) "I
! saw *something*" vs. yisʔí(n) "I saw *him/her/it*").  On the other hand, i-
! cannot occur with all transitive verbs -- whether or not a given transitive
! verb can appear with i- is essentially lexeme-specific information, and
! would likely be best treated as derivational.
!
! It would be nice to have i- represented in some way in the analyses produced
! and accepted by this model, even while modelling the presence or absence of
! i- as part of the lexical entry's definition (e.g., "kú=i_lo").  We therefore
! define the person "INDEF" here **without an accompanying affix form** (unlike
! si-, ni-, etc. above).  This allows us to recognize i- when it's present in
! the analysis of this lexeme, without generating the affix form here.
! (Transitive lexemes containing i- get marked as requiring @R.OBJECTPERSON.
! INDEF@, which prevents all other direct object markers from occurring. All
! other transitive lexemes without i- use @D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ to reject this
! affix)
@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                      DO-Present;


LEXICON 3SG-DO
! 3SG direct objects have different forms with non-3, 3SG, and 3PL subjects.
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                                            3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                        3SG-DO-3SG-Sbj;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                        3SG-DO-3PL-Sbj;

LEXICON 3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj
! 3SG direct objects may be realized slightly differently in ditransitive verbs
! when 3 indirect objects are also present.
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                          3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj-Ditransitive;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                              3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj-Transitive;

LEXICON 3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj-Ditransitive
! 3SG direct object with non-3 subject (e.g., moghàyìnisʔò ~ moghànisʔò "I
! will hand it (solid object) to him/her/it", gimoghàyìnisʔò ~ gimoghànisʔò
! "I will hand it (solid object) to them", noghànisʔò "I will hand it (solid
! object) to you").
!
! When a ditransitive verb with a non-3 subject and a 3SG direct object also
! has a 3SG or 3PL indirect object, then the direct object may optionally be
! marked with yi- (e.g., moghàyìnisʔò "I will hand it (solid object) to you",
! alongside moghànisʔò; and gimoghàyìnisʔò "I will hand it (solid object) to
! them", alongside gimoghànisʔò; TLL-20240702).  In all other cases, direct
! objects in ditransitive verbs are realized as they are in transitive verbs.
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                          3SG-DO-3-IO-Non3-Sbj-Ditransitive;
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                                 3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj-Transitive;

LEXICON 3SG-DO-3-IO-Non3-Sbj-Ditransitive
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@yi                        DO-Present;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@                                           Conative;
! TODO: Ditransitive verbs with non-3 subjects, 3SG direct objects, and 3SG/PL
! indirect objects aren't currently modelled as having distinct direct object
! marking before the conative prefix, and also not as having a distinct
! "emphatic" direct object form.  While both emphatic and conative-prefix
! forms are uncommon, in general, keep an eye out for ditransitive lexemes
! that might allow direct object marking in both of these cases to be checked.

LEXICON 3SG-DO-Non3-Sbj-Transitive
! 3SG direct object with non-3 subject (e.g., ístłí yisʔí "I saw a horse",
! yisʔí "I saw him/her/it", miyisʔí "I saw him/her/it" (emphatic); cf.
! TLQ-20210510)
!
! 3SG direct objects with non-3 subjects have a slightly different form before
! the conative prefix.  Here, mi- is the default form (e.g., iyí dátł'ìshí
! íssi "I will reading that book"; míssi "I will read it"), and doesn't have
! an emphatic interpretation.
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@U.CONATIVE.OFF@                           Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@U.CONATIVE.ON@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@mi         DO-Present;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@@U.CONATIVE.OFF@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@mi    DO-Present;

LEXICON 3SG-DO-3SG-Sbj
! 3SG direct object with 3SG subject (e.g., ístłí yíʔí "s/he saw a horse",
! yáʔí "s/he saw it (< yi- + yíʔí))
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@yi                        DO-Present;
